District of Columbia statutes.
22-3318

Malicious pollution of water.

Every person who maliciously commits any act by reason of which the supply of water, or any part thereof, to the City of Washington, becomes impure, filthy, or unfit for use, shall be fined not less than $500 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned at hard labor not more than 3 years nor less than 1 year.

R.S., § 1806
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 219 ac(b), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3118.
1973 Ed., § 22-3118.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “nor more than $1,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 219(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.